Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3325
Act; how construed.

Nothing in the License Suspension Act shall prevent the department, the county attorney, the authorized attorney, or the court of competent jurisdiction from taking other enforcement actions.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 25;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 160.